Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB342.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1516.2. Mindfulness Techniques.-- (a) Each school entity shall adopt a policy for providing classroom instruction to students in kindergarten through grade twelve in techniques of mindfulness for a minimum of fifteen minutes each school day.(b) The mindfulness techniques required by subsection (a) are not intended to be and shall not be conducted as a religious service or exercise.(c) The Department of Education shall:(1) Develop and distribute to school entities a model policy 1234567891011121314151617181920 on the teaching of mindfulness, which shall be consistent with subsection (a).(2) Develop a model mindfulness curriculum and make the curriculum available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools.(3) Develop and post on its publicly accessible Internet website materials and guidelines on current best practice techniques in the teaching of mindfulness as required under subsection (a).(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Mindfulness" shall mean the practice of being aware of one's body, mind and feelings in the present moment."Nonpublic school" shall mean a nonprofit school, other than a school entity, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act."School entity" shall mean a school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0342PN0297 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122